apertium-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="l/ide__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ider</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ides</l>      <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>        <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>       <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idende</l>    <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>idt</l>         <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>         <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idte</l>        <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idte</l>        <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>



</pardef>

<pardef n="sl/ippe__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ip</l>        <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippe</l>      <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ipper</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippes</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ap</l>        <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>     <r>ippe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ippende</l>   <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>         <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uppet</l>         <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>upne</l>        <r>ippe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>




</pardef>

<pardef n="gr/ibe__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ib</l>        <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ibe</l>       <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iber</l>      <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ibes</l>      <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eb</l>        <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebet</l>      <r>ibe<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ibende</l>    <r>ibe<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>ebet</l>         <r>ibe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebet</l>         <r>ibe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebne</l>        <r>ibe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ebne</l>        <r>ibe<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>



</pardef>

<pardef n="dø__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>des</l>        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ende</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>



</pardef>

<pardef n="dr/ikke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>        <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikke</l>      <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikker</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkes</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ak</l>        <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>     <r>ikke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ikkende</l>   <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>         <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukket</l>         <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>        <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ukne</l>        <r>ikke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="st/inke__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ik</l>        <r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inke</l>      <r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inker</l>     <r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inkes</l>     <r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ank</l>        <r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unket</l>     <r>inke<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inkende</l>   <r>inke<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>unket</l>         <r>inke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unket</l>         <r>inke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unkne</l>        <r>inke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unkne</l>        <r>inke<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="tr/æde__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>æd</l>        <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æde</l>       <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>æder</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ædes</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>      <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>       <r>æde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ædende</l>    <r>æde<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
    <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>         <r>æde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådt</l>         <r>æde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>        <r>æde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ådte</l>        <r>æde<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>



</pardef>

<e lm="angribe">            <i>angr</i><par n="gr/ibe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="begribe">            <i>begr</i><par n="gr/ibe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bestikke">           <i>best</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="betræde">            <i>betr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="bide">               <i>b</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blankslide">         <i>blanksl</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drikke">             <i>dr</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stinke">             <i>st</i><par n="st/inke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="dø">                 <i>dø</i><par n="dø__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forgribe">           <i>forgr</i><par n="gr/ibe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="forvride">           <i>forvr</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fremtræde">          <i>fremtr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="glide">              <i>gl</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gribe">              <i>gr</i><par n="gr/ibe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="kapdrikke">         <i>kapdr</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="knivstikke">        <i>knivst</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lide">               <i>l</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="opslide">            <i>opsl</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="optræde">            <i>optr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="overtræde">          <i>overtr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skambide">           <i>skamb</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skide">              <i>sk</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="skride">             <i>skrid</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slide">              <i>sl</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="slippe">             <i>sl</i><par n="sl/ippe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undslippe">             <i>undsl</i><par n="sl/ippe__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smide">              <i>sm</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="smugdrikke">         <i>smugdr</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stikke">             <i>st</i><par n="dr/ikke__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stride">             <i>str</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tiltræde">           <i>tiltr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="træde">              <i>tr</i><par n="tr/æde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="uddø">               <i>uddø</i><par n="dø__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="vride">              <i>vr</i><par n="l/ide__vblex"/></e>
